District of Columbia statutes.
9-202.05

Inapplicability of § 9-202.04.

Section 9-202.04 shall not apply to any application to close:

(1)

All or part of any alley when the application has been supported in writing by all of the owners of all the property in the square;

(2)

All or part of any alley where the width of the alley is 10 feet or less, and the application has been supported in writing by all of the owners of all the property abutting the entire alley;

(3)

All or part of any dead-end or unimproved street or alley when the application has been supported in writing by all of the record owners of all the property on both sides of the block(s) of the street which abuts the block(s) of that street to be closed or which abuts the entire alley;

(4)

All or any part of any alley when the application has been supported in writing by all of the record owners of all the property abutting the entire alley, and when land in the same square is concurrently provided for alley purposes either by:

(A)

Dedication; or

(B)

Easement;

(5)

All or part of any alley when:

(A)

The closing is supported in writing by all of the owners of the property in 2/3 of the square;

(B)

The alley, all or part of which is to be closed, is located entirely within 2/3 of the square owned by the persons supporting the closing; and

(C)

The owners propose to develop the entire area of the square which they own; and

(6)

All or part of any alley when the District or the United States holds title to all the property abutting the alley, all or part of which is to be closed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 205, 30 DCR 148
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 9, 32 DCR 30
1981 Ed., § 7-425.
This section is referenced in § 9-202.03, § 9-202.04, and § 9-202.10.